Rhode Island statutes. Title 1 Aeronautics
Chapter 4 Uniform Aeronautical Regulatory Act

1-4-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and cited as the “Uniform Aeronautical Regulatory Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-1

.

1-4-2.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter:

“Aeronautics” means transportation by aircraft, air instruction, the operation, repair, or maintenance of aircraft, and the design, operation, repair, or maintenance of airports, landing fields, or other air navigation facilities.

“Aircraft” means any contrivance now known or invented, used, or designed for navigation of, or flight in, the air, except a parachute or other contrivance designed for air navigation but used primarily as safety equipment.

“Air instruction” means the imparting of aeronautical information by any aviation instructor or in any air school or flying club.

“Airport” means any area of land, water, or both, which is used or is made available for the landing and take off of aircraft, and which provides facilities for the shelter, supply, and repair of aircraft and which, as to size, design, surface, marking, equipment, and management meets the minimum requirements established from time to time by the director.

“Air school” means any person engaged in giving, offering to give, or advertising, representing, or holding himself or herself out as giving, with or without compensation or other award, instruction in aeronautics — in flying, in ground subjects, or in both.

“Aviation instructor” means any individual engaged in giving, or offering to give, instruction in aeronautics — in flying, in ground subjects, or in both — either with or without compensation or other reward, without advertising his or her occupation, without calling his or her facilities “air school” or any equivalent term, and without employing or using other instructors.

“Certificated aircraft” means any aircraft for which an aircraft certificate other than a registration certificate has been issued by the government of the United States.

“Chief aeronautics inspector” or “aeronautics inspector” means an employee of the Rhode Island airport corporation, as defined in the Rhode Island airport corporation personnel job description manual, who is charged by the director to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

“Civil aircraft” means any aircraft other than a public aircraft.

“Dealer in aircraft” or “aircraft dealer” means any person who engages in a business, a substantial part of which consists of the manufacture, selling, or exchanging of aircraft and who is registered as a dealer with the federal government.

“Director” means the executive director of the Rhode Island airport corporation. “Deputy director” means the deputy director of the Rhode Island airport corporation.

“Flying club” means any person (other than an individual) who, neither for profit nor reward, owns, leases, or uses one or more aircraft for the purpose of instruction, pleasure, or both.

“Landing field” means any area of land, water, or both, which is used or is made available for the landing and take off of aircraft, which may or may not provide facilities for the shelter, supply, and repair of aircraft, and which, as to size, design, surface, marking, equipment, and management meets the minimum requirements established from time to time by the director.

“Military aircraft” means public aircraft operated in the service of the United States army, air force, national guard, navy, marine corps or coast guard.

“Operate” means, with respect to aircraft, to use, cause to use or authorize to use an aircraft, for the purpose of engine start, movement on the ground (taxi), or air navigation including the piloting of aircraft, with or without the right of legal control (as owner, lessee, or otherwise).

“Operator” means a person who operates or is in actual physical control of an aircraft.

“Owner” means the legal title holder or any person, firm, copartnership, association, or corporation having the lawful possession or control of an aircraft under a written sale agreement.

“Person” means any individual, or any corporation or other association of individuals.

“Political subdivision” means any city or town or any other public corporation, authority, or district, or any combination of two (2) or more, which is or may be authorized by law to acquire, establish, construct, maintain, improve, and operate airports.

“Public aircraft” means an aircraft used exclusively in the governmental service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-2

; P.L. 1966, ch. 242, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 78, § 7; P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 3.

1-4-3.
Liability of owner for injuries caused by aircraft.

Whenever any aircraft is used, operated, or caused to be operated in this state and an action is begun to recover damages for injuries arising to the person or to the property or for the death of a person, arising out of an accident or collision in which that aircraft was involved, or arising out of an accident caused by the dropping or falling of any object from that aircraft, evidence that at the time of the accident or collision it was registered in the name of the defendant as owner is prima facie evidence that it was then being operated by and under the control of a person for whose conduct the defendant was wholly responsible, and absence of that responsibility is an affirmative defense to be set up in the answer and proved by the defendant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-3

; P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 3.

1-4-3.1.
Notification and reporting of aircraft accidents.

The operator of an aircraft involved in an accident or incident as defined in 49 CFR 830 shall immediately notify the chief aeronautics inspector. This notification shall be in addition to any duty to notify and provide a report to the National Transportation Safety Board under 49 CFR 830. Furthermore, the operator shall file with the chief aeronautics inspector a copy of any report filed with the National Transportation Safety Board, which shall be a public record.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 4.

1-4-4.
Federal registration required.

No flight of civil aircraft, other than a foreign aircraft, is made or authorized to be made within this state unless the aircraft is possessed of valid aircraft registration and airworthiness or experimental certificates issued by the government of the United States, nor in violation of any term, specification, or limitation of those certificates. These restrictions do not apply to model aircraft operated in accordance with any regulations that the director may prescribe, or to a nonpassenger-carrying flight solely for inspection or test purposes authorized by the director or by the proper federal authority made without that certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-4

.

1-4-5.
Pilot’s license required.

No person shall operate any civil aircraft within this state unless that person is the holder of an effective pilot’s license, permit, or certificate issued by the government of the United States. This restriction shall not apply to any person operating any aircraft licensed by a foreign country with which the United States has a reciprocal agreement covering the operation of licensed aircraft, nor to persons operating model aircraft, nor to any person piloting an aircraft that is equipped with fully functioning dual controls when a certified instructor is in full charge of one set of those controls. No person shall operate any civil aircraft in this state in violation of any term, specification, or limitation of his or her pilot’s license, permit, or certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-5

.

1-4-6.
State registration of federal certificates.

All owners and operators, or owners or operators, of all aircraft, and dealers in aircraft, based or primarily used in the state of Rhode Island shall register the federal certificates of their aircraft and dealer registration as the director may by regulation prescribe. An aircraft shall be deemed to be based or primarily used in the state when in the normal course of its use, according to airport records, it leaves from and returns to or remains at one or more points within the state more often or longer than at any other single location outside of the state. Nonresidents may operate noncommercially within this state as an owner and operator, or owner or operator, or as a dealer, without that registration for not more than ninety (90) days in any calendar year. To operate commercially intrastate, nonresidents shall register.

Subject to the limitations of subsections (d) and (f), every person who operates an aircraft shall register the federal aircraft certificate of that aircraft with the chief aeronautics inspector during each period in which the aircraft is operated within this state in accordance with subsection (a). The annual fee for each registration, and for each registration renewal, is as follows: Aircraft weighing less than two thousand (2,000) pounds, thirty dollars ($30.00); two thousand and one (2,001) to three thousand (3,000) pounds, sixty dollars ($60.00); three thousand and one (3,001) to four thousand five hundred (4,500) pounds, one hundred ten dollars ($110); four thousand five hundred and one (4,501) to twelve thousand five hundred (12,500) pounds, one hundred sixty dollars ($160); over twelve thousand five hundred pounds (12,500), two hundred fifty dollars ($250). For the purpose of the annual fee, the weight considered will be the gross weight as published by the manufacturer. Every person who is a dealer in aircraft shall register his or her federal dealer’s aircraft registration certificate with the chief aeronautics inspector. The annual fee for registration of each federal dealer’s aircraft registration certificate is fifty dollars ($50.00) and for each aircraft in the possession operated solely for the purpose of sale or demonstration is twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Any person who engages in a business, a substantial portion of which consists of the manufacturing, selling, or exchanging of aircraft, and who does not have a federal dealer’s certificate shall register all aircraft owned by the person and operated within the state with the chief aeronautics inspector and pay the annual fee for that aircraft provided for in this subsection and is not eligible to pay the limited fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for all aircraft operated solely for the purpose of sale or demonstration.

All fees are in lieu of all personal property taxes on aircraft authorized by any law or ordinance. Registration certificates issued after expiration of the first six (6) months of the annual registration period, as prescribed by the director, are issued at the rate of fifty percent (50%) of the annual fee.

All fees are paid to the tax administrator of this state and delivery of the person’s receipt to the chief aeronautics inspector is a prerequisite to registration under this section.

Possession of the appropriate effective federal certificate, permit, rating or license relating to ownership and airworthiness of the aircraft, and the payment of the appropriate fee as set forth in this section are the only requisites for registration of an aircraft, or a dealer in aircraft.

Aircraft registration fees shall be reimbursed to persons who surrender their certificates before the date of expiration in accordance with the following schedule:

Before the first six (6) months of the period, fifty percent (50%) of the fee;

Before the first nine (9) months of the period, twenty-five percent (25%).

The provisions of this section shall not apply to:

An aircraft owned by, and used exclusively in the service of, any government, including the government of the United States or of any state of the United States, or political subdivision thereof, which is not engaged in carrying persons or property for commercial purposes;

An aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign country;

An aircraft owned by a nonresident and based in another state; or

An aircraft engaged principally in federally certified scheduled airline operation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 242, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 82, § 1.

1-4-7.
Carrying and posting of license and certificate — Evidence of nonissuance.

A required pilot’s license, permit, or certificate shall be kept in the personal possession of the pilot while the pilot is operating an aircraft within this state. Required aircraft certificates shall be carried in the aircraft at all times and shall be conspicuously posted in clear view of passengers. A pilot’s license, permit, or certificate and aircraft certificates shall be presented for inspection upon the demand of any passenger, any peace officer of this state, any authorized official or employee of the director, or the board, or any official, manager, or person in charge of any airport or landing field in this state upon which the pilot lands, or upon the reasonable request of any other person. In any criminal prosecution under any of the provisions of this chapter, a defendant who relies upon a license, permit, or certificate of any kind shall have the burden of proving that he or she is the possessor of a proper license, permit, or certificate. The fact of nonissuance of a license, permit, or certificate may be evidenced by a certificate signed by the official having power of issuance, or his or her deputy, under seal of office, stating that he or she has made diligent search in the records of his or her office and that from the records it appears that no license, permit, or certificate was issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-7

.

1-4-8.
Duties of director.

It shall be the duty of the director to foster aeronautics within this state in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and for that purpose the director shall:

Encourage the establishment of airports and other air navigation facilities;

Make recommendations to the governor and the general assembly as to necessary legislation or action;

Study the possibilities for the development of air commerce and the aeronautical industry and trade within the state and collect and disseminate information relative to the development; and

Advise with the Federal Aviation Administration and other agencies of the federal government and with state authorities in carrying forward any research and development work the tends to increase and improve aeronautics within this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-8

; P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 3.

1-4-9.
Jurisdiction of director.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, the director has supervision over aeronautics within the state, including:

The establishment, location, maintenance, operation, and use of airports, landing fields, air markings, air beacons, and other air navigation facilities; and

The establishment, operation, management, and equipment, of all air schools, flying clubs, and other persons giving air instruction.

All proposed airports, landing fields, and other air navigation facilities, shall be first approved by the director before they are used or operated. A political subdivision or person proposing to establish, alter, activate, or deactivate an airport or landing field shall make application to the chief aeronautics inspector, with a copy to the director, for a certificate of approval of the site selected and the general purpose or purposes for which the airport or landing field is to be established to insure that it shall conform to minimum standards or safety and shall serve public interest. A political subdivision or officer or employee, or any person shall not operate an airport, landing field, or other air navigation facility for which a certificate of approval has not been issued by the director.

The director shall establish by rules and regulations, in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42, guidelines for making application for a certificate of approval, criteria for determining whether to issue a certificate of approval, and fees for processing the applications and each renewal of certificates of approval.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-9

; P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 3.

1-4-10.
Rules and regulations.

The director shall adopt and promulgate, and may amend or repeal, rules and regulations establishing minimum standards with which all air navigation facilities, air schools, and flying clubs must comply, and shall adopt and enforce, and may amend or repeal rules, regulations, and orders, to safeguard from accident and to protect the safety of persons operating or using aircraft and persons and property on the ground, and to develop and promote aeronautics within this state. No rule or regulation of the director shall apply to airports, landing fields, air beacons or other air navigation facilities owned or operated within this state by the federal government. In order to avoid the danger of accident incident to confusion arising from conflicting rules, regulations, and orders governing aeronautics, the rules, regulations, and orders of the director shall be kept in conformity as nearly as may be with the federal legislation, rules, regulations, and orders on aeronautics, and shall not be inconsistent with paramount federal legislation, rules, regulations, and orders on the subject.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-10

.

1-4-10.1.
Air traffic rules.

Negligent, careless, or reckless operation. No person may operate an aircraft in a negligent, careless, or reckless manner so as to endanger the life or property of another.

Aerobatic flight. No person may operate an aircraft in aerobatic flight: (1) Over any congested or residential area of a city, town, or settlement; (2) Over an open-air assembly of persons; (3) Within the lateral boundaries of the surface areas of Class B, Class C, Class D, or Class E airspace designated for an airport, as defined in the Federal Aviation Regulations; (4) Within four (4) nautical miles of the center line of any federal airways; (5) Below an altitude of one thousand five hundred (1,500) feet above the surface; or (6) When flight visibility is less than three (3) statute miles. For the purposes of this section, “aerobatic flight” means an intentional maneuver involving an abrupt change in an aircraft’s attitude, an abnormal attitude, or abnormal acceleration not necessary for normal flight.

Minimum safe altitudes. Except when necessary for takeoff or landing, no person may operate an aircraft below the following altitudes:

Anywhere. An altitude allowing, if a power unit fails, an emergency landing without undue hazard to persons or property on the surface;

Over a school, residential, or congested area. Over any congested or residential area of a city, town, or settlement, or over any open-air assembly of persons, an altitude of one thousand feet (1,000) feet above the highest obstacle within a horizontal radius of two thousand (2,000) feet of the aircraft;

Over other than congested areas. An altitude of five hundred (500) feet above the surface, except over open water or sparsely populated areas. In those cases, the aircraft may not be operated closer than five hundred (500) feet to any person, vessel, vehicle, or structure;

Helicopters. Helicopters may be operated at less than the minimums prescribed in paragraphs (2) or (3) of this subsection if the operation is conducted without hazard to persons or property on the surface. In addition, each person operating a helicopter shall comply with any routes or altitudes specifically prescribed for helicopters by the administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration.

Severability. If any provision of this section or the application of a provision shall for any reason, be judged invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the section, but shall be confined in this effect to the provisions or application directly involved in the controversy giving rise to the judgment.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 4.

1-4-10.2.
Prohibitions.

It shall be unlawful:

For any person to operate or authorize the operation of any civil aircraft which does not possess a valid identification mark assigned by the federal government.

For any resident to own or authorize the operation of any civil aircraft owned by him or her which does not have a currently effective Rhode Island state registration certificate, and for which the aircraft operating fee, if required, has not been paid.

For any nonresident to own or authorize the operation of any civil aircraft owned by him or her and located in Rhode Island for more than ninety (90) days cumulatively during a registration year, which does not have a currently effective Rhode Island state registration certificate, and for which the aircraft operating fee, if required, has not been paid.

For any person to own or to operate an aircraft which fails to display the currently effective registration decal or other identifier as required by regulations adopted under §

1-4-10

by the director.

For any person to operate or authorize the operation of any civil aircraft in air commerce within the state which does not have a currently effective airworthiness certificate and a state registration certificate and having paid the aircraft operating fee, if required.

For any person to operate or permit operation of aircraft on or from any airport for compensation or hire, unless the area is registered with the department.

For any person to operate or authorize the operation of aircraft in violation of any other rule or regulation, or in violation of the terms of any certificate, issued under the authority of this chapter.

For any person to operate or attempt to operate an aircraft on the ground, on the public waters, or in the air while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or of any controlled drug which affects a person’s ability to operate an aircraft in a safe manner or while having 4/100 percent or more by weight alcohol in his or her blood.

For any owner or operator of an aircraft having knowledge of an aircraft accident or aircraft incident to fail to report facts concerning the accident or incident to the department or a law enforcement officer within seven (7) days of the occurrence of the event, unless incapacitated by death or injury.

For any person to touch any part of aircraft wreckage at an aircraft accident scene, except for rescue of persons and/or classified materials, without specific approval of the federal or state official responsible for the accident scene.

For any person to operate any ground vehicle which is unrelated to aircraft operations or servicing, or airport operations and maintenance, within the boundaries of any public airport without the express consent of the airport manager. This subsection does not prohibit the operation of a ground vehicle upon a road laid out in the airport to provide access to or egress from the airport.

For any person to make or cause to be made an intentional false light, signal, or report of an aircraft accident, or missing aircraft, or, in an emergency situation, to use any device or equipment to initiate or to have others initiate an emergency response by any public or private agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 308, § 1.

1-4-10.3.
Abandoned aircraft.

Authority to take. The director, chief aeronautics inspector, aeronautical inspectors, or any police officer of the Rhode Island airport corporation, upon discovery of any aircraft or aircraft parts apparently abandoned, or of any aircraft without a currently effective state of Rhode Island or federal registration certificate, whether situated within any public or private airfield open for public use for a period in excess of one year, may take such aircraft or aircraft component into his or her custody and may cause the same to be taken away and stored in some suitable place out of public view.

Lien. All charges necessarily incurred by such custodian in the performance of carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall be a lien upon such aircraft or aircraft component in accordance with §

34-47-1

. The custodian or manager of any hangar, airport facility or other place where such aircraft or aircraft component may be stored shall have a lien upon such aircraft or aircraft component for his or her storage charges.

Owner may reclaim. The owner of an aircraft or aircraft component so placed in storage may reclaim the same before any sale by paying the charges incurred.

Sale authorized. If such aircraft or aircraft component shall have been so stored for a period of ninety (90) days, the Rhode Island airport corporation may sell the same, at public auction, for cash or may otherwise dispose of such aircraft or aircraft component. No sale under the provisions herein shall be valid unless the notice required by subsection (e) of this section has been given.

Notice of sale. Notice of such sale shall be given by publishing a notice in a newspaper of state circulation at least fourteen (14) days before the sale. If the last place of abode of the owner of such aircraft or aircraft component is known to, or may be ascertained by, such custodian or manager by the exercise of reasonable diligence, a notice of the time and place of such sale shall be given to said owner by registered mail, at least fourteen (14) days prior to said sale.

Application of proceeds. The balance of the proceeds of sale, if any, after payment of the amount of liens and the reasonable expenses incident to the sale, shall be paid to the owner of such aircraft or aircraft component or his or her legal representative, if claimed at any time within one year from the date of such sale. If such balance shall not be claimed within said period, it shall be paid to the Rhode Island airport corporation.

Exemption from liability. No employee of the Rhode Island airport corporation or any officer empowered to enforce the provisions of §§

1-4-10.2

—

1-4-14

, inclusive, and any other applicable section of the uniform air regulatory act, shall be liable for any act performed under the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 179, § 1.

1-4-11.
Posting, notice, and filing of rules, regulations, and orders.

Every general rule, regulation, and order of the director shall be posted for public inspection in the main aeronautics office of the director at least five (5) days before it becomes effective, and shall be given any further publicity, by advertisement in a newspaper or otherwise, as the director deems advisable.

Every order applying only to a particular person or persons named in it shall be mailed to, or served upon, that person or persons.

Every rule, regulation, and order, general or otherwise, adopted by the director shall be kept on file with the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-11

.

1-4-12.
Investigations and hearings — Subpoena powers.

The director has the power to conduct investigations, inquiries, and hearings concerning matters covered by the provisions of this chapter and accidents or injuries incident to the operation of aircraft occurring within this state. The director has the power to administer oaths and affirmations, certify to all official acts, issue subpoenas, or subpoenas duces tecum, compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and the production of papers, books, and documents. If any person fails to comply with any subpoena, subpoena duces tecum, or order issued under authority of this chapter, the director may invoke the aid of any superior court in this state. The court may order the person to comply with the requirements of the subpoena, subpoena duces tecum, or order of the director, or to give evidence upon the matter in question. Any failure to obey the order of the court is punishable by the court as a contempt of court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-12

.

1-4-13.
Reports of hearings and investigations as evidence — Testimony by director, deputy director, and aeronautics inspectors.

The reports of investigations or hearings, or any part of the reports, shall not be admitted in evidence or used for any purpose in any suit, action, or proceeding growing out of any matter referred to in those investigations or hearings, or in any report, except in the case of criminal or other proceedings instituted by, or on behalf of, the director under the provisions of this chapter; nor shall the director, nor the deputy director, nor any aeronautics inspector, be required to testify to any facts ascertained in, or information gained by reason of, his or her official capacity. Neither the director, nor the deputy director, nor any aeronautics inspector for airports, shall be required to testify as an expert witness in any suit, action, or proceeding involving any aircraft or any navigation facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-13

; P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 3.

1-4-14.
Enforcement — Cooperation of public agencies.

It is the duty of the director, deputy director, aeronautics inspectors, and every state and municipal officer charged with the enforcement of state laws to enforce and assist in the enforcement of this chapter. The director is further authorized in the name of the state to enforce the provisions of this chapter by appropriate proceedings in the superior courts of this state. Other departments and political subdivisions of this state are authorized to cooperate with the director in the development of aeronautics within this state.

The director, deputy director, aeronautics inspectors, and selected employees of the Rhode Island airport corporation to whom such powers may be delegated in the discharge of the duties of their office, have, in any part of the state, the same authority to make arrests for violation of the statutes, laws, rules, and regulations relating to aviation and airport security matters, and to enforce those statutes, laws, rules, and regulations, as regular constituted law enforcement officers in the state.

The director shall issue to each selected employee credentials showing his or her authority to arrest, which credentials shall be carried upon the person of the designated employee while in the performance of his or her duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-14

; P.L. 1972, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 3.

1-4-15.
Reasons for orders — Closing of facilities — Inspection powers.

In any case where the director, pursuant to this chapter, issues any order requiring or prohibiting certain things to be done, the director shall set forth his or her reasons for the order and state the requirements to be met before approval is given or the rule, regulation, or order shall be modified or changed. In any case where the director deems the action necessary or proper, the director may order the closing of any airport or landing field, or the cessation of operations of any air school, flying club, air beacon, or other air navigation facility, until the requirements laid down by the director have been fulfilled. To carry out the provisions of this chapter, the director, deputy director, aeronautics inspectors and any officers, state or municipal, charged with the duty of enforcing this chapter, may inspect and examine, at reasonable hours, any premises, the aircraft and the buildings and other structures, where those airports, landing fields, air schools, flying clubs, air beacons, or other air navigation facilities are operated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-15

; P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 3.

1-4-16.
Right to judicial review of orders.

Any person against whom an order is entered may obtain a judicial review of that order under the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-16

.

1-4-17.
[Superseded.]

1-4-18.
Waiver of review by failure to appeal.

If an appeal is not taken from the order of the director within the fixed period, the party against whom the order was entered shall be deemed to have waived the right to have the reasonableness or lawfulness of the order reviewed by a court and that issue shall not be tried in any court in which suit may be instituted for the penalty for failure to comply with the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-18

.

1-4-19.
Penalty for violations.

Any person failing to comply with the requirements, or violating any of the provisions of this chapter, or the rules, regulations, or orders adopted by the director is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-19

.

1-4-20.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

1-4-20

.